Utah statutes.
63M-1-2802.   Findings.
        (1)  The Legislature finds that:
(a)  to foster and develop the alternative energy industry in Utah, including
generation and manufacturing, will promote the interest of Utah's citizens in
encouraging the growth of the state's economy;
(b)  Utah loses prospective high paying jobs, new economic growth, and
corresponding incremental new state and local revenues to competing states due
to a wide variety of competing energy incentives offered by those states; and
(c)  alternative energy initiatives and interests of state and local officials
should be aligned and united in alternative energy generation and related
manufacturing.
(2)  This part is enacted to:
(a)  increase generation of alternative energy and create high paying jobs in
the alternative energy industry, thereby growing the state's economy and
corresponding state and local revenues by providing tax credits to attract new
alternative energy projects and assist in the expansion of existing
alternative energy projects located within alternative energy development
zones in the state; and
(b)  provide a cooperative and unified working relationship between state and
local alternative energy development efforts.
